District of Columbia statutes.
20-321

Nature of proceeding.

A standard probate proceeding is a proceeding for the probate of a will or a determination of the decedent’s intestacy, particularly when due execution of a will cannot be presumed under section 20-312 , and for the appointment of a personal representative. This proceeding is instituted when an interested person or creditor files a petition for a standard probate proceeding with the Court in accordance with the provisions of section 20-304 ; and the filing of a complaint shall not be required for these purposes. This proceeding is conducted after notice as provided in section 20-323 . If no petition for abbreviated or standard probate is filed within a reasonable time, the Register, with the approval of the Court, may file a petition for standard probate.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(n), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-101.
1981 Ed., § 20-321.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-304.